Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-183
Livestock, defined.

Livestock means any domestic cattle, horses, mules, donkeys, sheep, or swine.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 14.

Dogs are not livestock and the care or production of dogs cannot be included in the term animal husbandry. City of Beatrice v. Goodenkauf, 219 Neb. 756, 366 N.W.2d 411 (1985).